Utah statutes.
52-1-9.   Successive actions on official bonds.

A judgment in favor of a party for one delinquency does not preclude the same or another party from suing on the same security for another delinquency, but sureties can be made liable in the aggregate only to the extent of their undertaking.



No Change Since 1953

